Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 7 Procedure at the Polling Place
2-7-141. Procedures for certain active voters.

If the registration of a voter has been transferred to a new precinct within the same county pursuant to § 2-2-129(b)(2)(A), the voter shall be required to vote under the procedures of this section.

A registered voter whose registration has been transferred pursuant to § 2-2-129(b)(2)(A), but who has in fact not moved or has moved to a different address from that supplied by the postal service, shall be required to make a written affirmation of such registered voter's current address of residence and that the voter is entitled to vote before voting. This affirmation shall be made on a standard form provided by the county election commission and shall be made before the officer of elections at the voter's polling place or the appropriate election official at an early voting site. The voter may then vote using the same method as any other voter at the polling place. The fact that this voter is a registered voter and has not already voted in the current election must be confirmed by the county election commission before this person may vote.

A county election commission may establish a centrally located site or sites to be designated by such commission for voters voting under this subsection (b).

If a county election commission elects to establish a centrally located site or sites, then the official at such polling location shall notify the voter that the voter has the option to vote either at the new polling place or at a centrally located site or sites. If a central location is other than the county election commission office, then such centrally located site shall be equipped with computer capabilities linked to the county election commission office to allow the voter's records to be changed or corrected in the same manner as if the voter were to appear at the county election commission office on election day in order that the voter may cast the appropriate ballot.

A registered voter whose registration has been transferred pursuant to § 2-2-129(b)(2)(A), who has in fact moved to the new address of residence recorded by the administrator of elections, and who appears to vote at an early voting site or at the new precinct to which the voter's registration has been transferred, shall vote using the same method as any other voter at the polling place.

Acts 1999, ch. 499, § 2; 2003, ch. 307, § 2.

Cross-References. Procedures for transfer of registration, §2-2-129.

2-7-142. Use of mobile electronic or communication devices at polling places.

A county election commission shall not prohibit a voter from using a mobile electronic or communication device at a polling place for informational purposes to assist the voter in making election decisions. A county election commission may require that any mobile electronic or communication device be silenced while in use at the polling place.

Any voter using a mobile electronic or communication device as allowed in subsection (a) shall be prohibited from using the device for telephone conversations, recording, or taking photographs or videos while inside the polling place.

Acts 2015, ch. 315, § 1.

Compiler's Note. For the Preamble to the act concerning legislative findings related to use of mobile electronic or communication devices at polling places, see Acts 2015, ch. 315.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 315, § 2. January 1, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. The regulations in T.C.A. §2-7-142 do not violate the right to freedom of speech guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and article I, section 19 of the Tennessee Constitution. The interior of a polling place is a nonpublic forum. The government may, without violating either the U.S. or the Tennessee Constitution, regulate speech and expressive conduct in a nonpublic forum as long as the regulation is reasonable in light of that forum’s purpose. The prohibitions in T.C.A. §2-7-142 are content-neutral regulations that are reasonable in light of the purposes of a polling place, which include (1) ensuring privacy of the ballot, speed and efficiency of the voting process, and integrity of the election, and (2) preventing disruption and distraction for voters, voter intimidation, and interference and fraud in the balloting process. OAG 16-49, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (12/22/2016).

2-7-143. Tennessee Freedom of Speech Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Freedom of Speech Act.”

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, during the period beginning sixty (60) days before a general election until the day after the next subsequent general election:

This state, a local government, or any other political subdivision of this state:

Shall not regulate the shape or quantity of political or campaign posters or signs placed on private property that is located more than one hundred feet (100') from a polling place if the signs or posters are placed on the property by the owner of the property or any lawful resident of a residence on the property;

May prohibit, notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1)(A), any political or campaign poster or sign covered by this section from exceeding:

For commercial property, thirty-two square feet (32 sq. ft.) in size; and

For residential property, sixteen square feet (16 sq. ft.) in size; and

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1)(A), may adopt reasonable restrictions limiting the number of political campaign signs or posters that may be placed on property; provided, that such restrictions authorize an owner or resident to place at least one (1) poster or sign on the property per candidate, issue, or subject; and

A homeowners' association shall not, by covenant, condition, restriction, or rule, prohibit the display of political or campaign posters or signs placed on private property by the owner of the property or any lawful resident of a residence on the property. A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable covenants, conditions, restrictions, or rules with respect to the placement of political or campaign posters or signs placed on homeowner association common space and private property maintained by the owner or resident, including limiting the size of campaign posters or signs in those common and private property areas to four square feet (4 sq. ft.).

A lessor of residential property may require a lessee to obtain the written permission of the lessor prior to placing any political or campaign posters or signs on such residential property. Any such requirement must be included in the lease or rental agreement.

This section applies to any clause, covenant, condition, restriction, or rule contained in any agreement or contract between a homeowners' association and property owner or between a lessor and lessee executed or modified after July 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 294, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

In 2020, the text of Acts 2017, ch. 294, § 2 was added as subsection (d) by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 294, § 3. July 1, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Political canvassing is an expressive activity protected by the First Amendment, but the First Amendment prohibits only state action that abridges speech or expression. Homeowners' associations are private entities, not state actors, and are not subject to the First Amendment. Thus, private homeowners' associations may prohibit or otherwise restrict political canvassing without implicating the First Amendment. Furthermore, the Tennessee Freedom of Speech Act does not place any restrictions on homeowners' associations with respect to political canvassing. Nor do other statutes limit the authority of homeowners' associations to prohibit or otherwise restrict political canvassing. OAG 19-13, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 34 (9/5/2019).